dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ér inregolari: (re)?av?er, (re)?g(av?)?er
# different conjugation in indicative present, subjunctive present, imperative present, participle passive, gerund simple
# subjunctive present of "apier"
# NOTE: see also other derivations in dic file!
# NOTE: does not have procomplementar form for imperative
SFX xB Y 241
SFX xB aver ò/I1 aver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + [oe]
SFX xB aver à/I1 aver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + [oe]
SFX xB aver è/I1 aver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + [oe], belumat, buranèl, pavan
SFX xB r mo/I2 ver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er imo/I2 ver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er om/I2 aer	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB aver emo/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB aver imo/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB er on/I2 ver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xB r n/I2 ver	vt:indicative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + én
SFX xB aver à/I3 aver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10 = T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB ver s/I3 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10s = T8 + es, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB aver è/I3 aver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10 = T8 + e, 2s=3, viŧentin
SFX xB er is/I3 aer	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10s = T8 + es, 2s=3, pavan
SFX xB aver ès/I3 aver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T10s = T8 + es, 2s=3, viŧentin
SFX xB er é/I4 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xB ver í/I4 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:plural	# T5, paduan
SFX xB er í/I4 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xB er è/I4 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é), ŧenedexe
SFX xB er iè/I4 ver	vt:indicative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é), veneŧian
SFX xB aver à/I5I7 aver	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10
SFX xB r 0/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10
SFX xB ver i/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10, đulian
SFX xB ver ea/I1 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:singular	# T2 + (v)[aeo]
SFX xB ver ee/I1 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:singular	# T2 + (v)[aeo]
SFX xB aver évimo/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xB aver évino/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T2 + (v)imo, arkàego
SFX xB aver ívimo/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xB aver ívino/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T2 + (v)imo, arkàego
SFX xB aver ívinu/I2 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T2 + (v)imo, pavan
SFX xB er on/I2P4 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T11 + (iv)([ei])ón(s[ei])
SFX xB r on/I2P4 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:first is:plural	# T11 + (iv)([ei])ón(s[ei]), feltrin
SFX xB ver é/I4 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:second is:plural	# T11 + (iv)ié, belumat
SFX xB aver eva/I5I7 gaver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r a/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r e/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xB ver rò/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver rà/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver rè/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver ron/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rón
SFX xB ver rion/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rón
SFX xB ver ren/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rén
SFX xB ver rà/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver ras/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver ré/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver res/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver rí/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver ris/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver rà/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver arò/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver arà/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver arè/I1 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xB ver aron/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rón
SFX xB ver arion/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rón
SFX xB ver aren/I2 ver	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rén
SFX xB ver arà/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver aras/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver aré/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver ares/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver arí/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xB ver aris/I3 ver	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xB ver arà/I5I7 ver	vt:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver bia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX xB ver bie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB ver biemo ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB ver bimo ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB ver bion/P3 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB ver bien/P3 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver bi ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX xB ver bia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB ver bie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB ver biè ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, veneŧian
SFX xB ver bié/P5 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), arkade
SFX xB ver biee ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), soligexe
SFX xB ver bí ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xB ver bie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + e
SFX xB ver bia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB ver pia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + a
SFX xB ver pie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e
SFX xB ver piemo ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB ver pimo ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xB ver pion/P3 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xB ver pien/P3 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xB ver pi ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + i
SFX xB ver pia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB ver pie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
SFX xB ver piè ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5, veneŧian
SFX xB ver pié/P5 ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), arkade
SFX xB ver piee ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + é([dg]?e), soligexe
SFX xB ver pí ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xB ver pie ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + e
SFX xB ver pia ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
SFX xB aver èpie aver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e, belumat
SFX xB aver èpe aver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e, belumat
SFX xB aver ebe aver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e, belumat
SFX xB ver be ver	vt:subjunctive+present is:first is:singular	# T8 + e, belumat
SFX xB aver èpie aver	vt:subjunctive+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3, belumat
