dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
aver/T1T8N0N1L1l1W3w3P0P1P2xB.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
aer/T1T8N0N1N4L1L3l1l3W3w3P0P1P2xB.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple st:aver
gaver/T1T8N0N1N4L1L3l1l3W3w3P0P1P2xB.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
